Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.050

Solid waste disposal—Transfer stations.

When a comprehensive solid waste plan, as provided in RCW 70A.205.040, incorporates the use of transfer stations, such stations shall be considered part of the disposal site and as such, along with the transportation of solid wastes between disposal sites, shall be exempt from regulation by the Washington utilities and transportation commission as provided in chapter 81.77 RCW.

Each county may enter into contracts for the hauling of trailers of solid wastes from these transfer stations to disposal sites and return either by (1) the normal bidding process, or (2) negotiation with the qualified collection company servicing the area under authority of chapter 81.77 RCW.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1024; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 58 s 3.]